apertium-en-mt.mt.metadix
    <pardef n="/huwa__vbser">
      <e><p><l>jiena</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inti</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>huwa</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hija</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ahna</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>intom</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>huma</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>miniex</l><r>ma<s n="adv"/><j/>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mintix</l><r>ma<s n="adv"/><j/>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mhuwiex</l><r>ma<s n="adv"/><j/>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mhijiex</l><r>ma<s n="adv"/><j/>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mahniex</l><r>ma<s n="adv"/><j/>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mintomx</l><r>ma<s n="adv"/><j/>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mhumiex</l><r>ma<s n="adv"/><j/>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>inkun</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkun</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jkun</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkun</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nkunu</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkunu</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jkunu</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inkunx</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkunx</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jkunx</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkunx</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nkunux</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tkunux</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jkunux</l><r>huwa<s n="vbser"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="neg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="huwa"><i></i><par n="/huwa__vbser"/></e>
